Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.533

Unprofessional conduct—Abrogation of copayment provisions.

It is unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW for a dentist to abrogate the copayment provisions of a contract by accepting the payment received from a third party payer as full payment.

[ 1985 c 202 s 1.]